Utah statutes.
57-8a-214.   Fair and reasonable notice.

(1)  Notice that an association provides by a method allowed under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, constitutes fair and reasonable notice, regardless of whether or not the association is a nonprofit corporation.

(2)  Notice that an association provides by a method not referred to in Subsection (1) constitutes fair and reasonable notice if:

(a)  the method is authorized in the declaration, articles, bylaws, or rules; and

(b)  considering all the circumstances, the notice is fair and reasonable.

(3) (a)  If provided in the declaration, articles, bylaws, or rules, an association may provide notice by electronic means, including text message, email, or the association's website.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), a lot owner may, by written demand, require an association to provide notice to the lot owner by mail.

